Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB990.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2201 of Title 8 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2201. Authority of boroughs.* * *(c) Ordinances.--A borough may enact and enforce ordinances to govern and regulate the planning, management, implementation, construction and maintenance of storm water facilities.Section 2. Section 2203 of Title 8 is amended to read:§ 2203. Manner of financing work.(a) Financing.--A borough may pay for the costs and expenses 123456789101112131415161718192021 of any work or activity authorized under section 2201 (relating to authority of boroughs) wholly or in part from money of the borough available for the purpose.(b) Assessments.--To the extent that a borough does not receive assistance from the Federal, State or county government for the costs and expenses of the work, the borough may assess the benefited properties located within the drainage area of the watercourse in accordance with Chapter 21A (relating to assessments and charges for public improvements).(c) Fees.--For the purposes of funding the construction, maintenance and operation of storm water management facilities, systems and management plans authorized under this chapter, a borough may assess reasonable and uniform fees based in whole or in part on the characteristics of the property benefited by the facilities, systems and management plans. In establishing the fees, the borough shall consider and provide appropriate exemptions or credits for properties that have installed and are maintaining storm water facilities that meet best management practices and are approved or inspected by the borough. The assessed fees shall be filed with the borough treasurer. An ordinance shall specify whether payments are to be made by annual or more frequent installments.(C) FEES.--(1) FOR THE PURPOSES OF FUNDING THE CONSTRUCTION, MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION OF STORM WATER MANAGEMENT FACILITIES, SYSTEMS AND MANAGEMENT PLANS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS CHAPTER, A BOROUGH MAY ASSESS REASONABLE AND UNIFORM FEES BASED IN WHOLE OR IN PART ON THE CHARACTERISTICS OF THE PROPERTY BENEFITED BY THE FACILITIES, SYSTEMS AND MANAGEMENT PLANS.20250HB0990PN1328 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) IN ESTABLISHING THE FEES, THE BOROUGH MAY INCLUDE A MEASURE OF A PROPERTY'S IMPERVIOUS SURFACE AS DETERMINED BY THE BOROUGH. ALL PROPERTIES CONTAINING IMPERVIOUS SURFACE ARE PRESUMED TO BENEFIT FROM THE BOROUGH'S STORM WATER PLANNING, MANAGEMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE TERM "IMPERVIOUS SURFACE" MEANS AN AREA, MATERIAL, STRUCTURE, SURFACE OR IMPROVEMENT THAT DOES NOT ALLOW OR THAT REDUCES OR PREVENTS INFILTRATION OF WATER INTO SOIL, INCLUDING COMPACTED DIRT, GRAVEL, CONCRETE, ASPHALT, ROADS, SIDEWALKS, PARKING LOTS, DRIVEWAYS, PATIOS, ROOFS, GARAGES AND STORAGE SHEDS.(3) IN ESTABLISHING THE FEES, THE BOROUGH SHALL CONSIDER AND PROVIDE APPROPRIATE EXEMPTIONS OR CREDITS FOR PROPERTIES THAT HAVE INSTALLED AND ARE MAINTAINING STORM WATER FACILITIES THAT MEET BEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICES AND ARE APPROVED OR INSPECTED BY THE BOROUGH. THE ASSESSED FEES SHALL BE FILED WITH THE BOROUGH TREASURER. AN ORDINANCE SHALL SPECIFY WHETHER PAYMENTS ARE TO BE MADE BY ANNUAL OR MORE FREQUENT INSTALLMENTS.(d) Methods of assessment.--A fee levied by the borough may be assessed in one of the following methods:(1) On all properties in the borough.(2) On all properties benefited by a specific storm water project.(3) By establishing a storm water management district and assessing the fee on all property owners in the district.(e) Use.--A fee collected for the purposes of storm water management may only be used for the purposes authorized under this chapter.Section 3. Title 8 is amended by adding a part to read:20250HB0990PN1328 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PART IIINCORPORATED TOWNSChapter41. (Reserved)74. Storm Water Management Plans and FacilitiesCHAPTER 41(Reserved)CHAPTER 74STORM WATER MANAGEMENT PLANS AND FACILITIESSec.7401. Storm water management systems authorized.7402. Construction of storm water management facilities.7403. System management.7404. Ordinances.7405. Fees.§ 7401 . Storm water management systems authorized. The town council may plan, design, construct, assemble, install and alter facilities, including inlets, outlets, systems of piping, diversion terraces, grass waterways, energy dissipaters, storm water retention devices and natural or artificial infiltration areas, to manage surface water runoff.§ 7402 . Construction of storm water management facilities. (a) Acquisition.--The town council may acquire by purchase, deed of dedication or eminent domain proceedings all or part of an existing system or facility for the management of surface water runoff that may have been established or constructed by a property owner in the incorporated town or establish, construct and maintain systems or facilities in the best interest of the incorporated town.(b) Price.--If the town council and the owners of systems 20250HB0990PN1328 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 can agree upon a price to be paid by the incorporated town, the purchase may be consummated if the amount to be paid does not exceed the actual value of the facilities to be transferred.(c) Eminent domain.--If the town council acquires the system by the exercise of eminent domain, the damages shall be determined by viewers under this title for eminent domain proceedings.§ 7403 . System management. (a) Management.--When exercising the powers under this chapter , the town council shall manage storm water originating in or passing through the incorporated town in a manner that is consistent with the requirements of the act of October 4, 1978 (P.L.864, No.167), known as the Storm Water Management Act, and the storm water management guidelines and any regulations that may be adopted by the Department of Environmental Protection.(b) Consistency.--All storm water management activities must be consistent with a watershed storm water management plan when the plan has been approved by the Department of Environmental Protection.(c) Review by county conservation district.--If storm water management activities are undertaken in watersheds for which there is no approved storm water management plan, all drawings, documents, profiles and designs and descriptions of the proposed activities to be undertaken by the incorporated town shall be submitted to the county conservation district for review and comment before the initiation of earthmoving activities. The conservation district shall have 30 days to review and respond with comments to the board of commissioners. Failure to respond within that time constitutes favorable comment by the conservation district.20250HB0990PN1328 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 7404 . Ordinances. (a) Storm water management.--The town council may enact storm water management ordinances and require persons conducting earthmoving activities to obtain approval from the board of commissioners for those activities. Ordinances must be consistent with watershed storm water management plans where they exist and in all cases must be consistent with the act of October 4, 1978 (P.L.864, No.167), known as the Storm Water Management Act.(b) Storm water facilities.--The town council may enact and enforce ordinances to govern and regulate the planning, management, implementation, construction and maintenance of storm water facilities.§ 7405 . Fees. (a) Fee structure.--For the purposes of funding the construction, maintenance and operation of storm water management facilities, systems and plans authorized under this chapter, an incorporated town may assess reasonable and uniform fees based in whole or in part on the characteristics of the property benefited by the facilities, systems and plans. In establishing the fees, the incorporated town shall consider and provide appropriate exemptions or credits for properties that have installed and are maintaining storm water facilities that meet best management practices and are approved or inspected by the incorporated town.(A) FEE STRUCTURE.--(1) FOR THE PURPOSES OF FUNDING THE CONSTRUCTION, MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION OF STORM WATER MANAGEMENT FACILITIES, SYSTEMS AND PLANS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS CHAPTER, AN INCORPORATED TOWN MAY ASSESS REASONABLE AND UNIFORM FEES 20250HB0990PN1328 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 BASED IN WHOLE OR IN PART ON THE CHARACTERISTICS OF THE PROPERTY BENEFITED BY THE FACILITIES, SYSTEMS AND PLANS.(2) IN ESTABLISHING THE FEES, THE INCORPORATED TOWN MAY INCLUDE A MEASURE OF A PROPERTY'S IMPERVIOUS SURFACE AS DETERMINED BY THE INCORPORATED TOWN. ALL PROPERTIES CONTAINING IMPERVIOUS SURFACE ARE PRESUMED TO BENEFIT FROM THE INCORPORATED TOWN'S STORM WATER PLANNING, MANAGEMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE TERM "IMPERVIOUS SURFACE" MEANS AN AREA, MATERIAL, STRUCTURE, SURFACE OR IMPROVEMENT THAT DOES NOT ALLOW OR THAT REDUCES OR PREVENTS INFILTRATION OF WATER INTO SOIL, INCLUDING COMPACTED DIRT, GRAVEL, CONCRETE, ASPHALT, ROADS, SIDEWALKS, PARKING LOTS, DRIVEWAYS, PATIOS, ROOFS, GARAGES AND STORAGE SHEDS.(3) IN ESTABLISHING THE FEES, THE INCORPORATED TOWN SHALL CONSIDER AND PROVIDE APPROPRIATE EXEMPTIONS OR CREDITS FOR PROPERTIES THAT HAVE INSTALLED AND ARE MAINTAINING STORM WATER FACILITIES THAT MEET BEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICES AND ARE APPROVED OR INSPECTED BY THE INCORPORATED TOWN.(b) Methods of assessments.--A fee levied by the incorporated town may be assessed in one of the following methods:(1) On all properties in the incorporated town.(2) On all properties benefited by a specific storm water project.(3) By establishing a storm water management district and assessing the fee on all property owners in the district.(c) Use.--A fee collected for the purposes of storm water management may only be used for the purposes authorized under this chapter . (d) Filing.--The assessments shall be filed with the town 20250HB0990PN1328 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 treasurer.(e) Payments.--An ordinance shall specify whether payments are to be made by annual or more frequent installments.Section 4. Section 13401 of Title 11 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 13401. Establishing and changing watercourses, flood protection projects and storm water systems.* * *(c) Ordinances.--A city may enact and enforce ordinances to govern and regulate the planning, management, implementation, construction and maintenance of storm water facilities.Section 5. Section 13407 heading of Title 11 is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 13407. Assessment of benefits [and], liens and fees.* * *(d) Fees.--For the purposes of funding the construction, maintenance and operation of storm water management facilities, systems and management plans authorized under this chapter, a city may assess reasonable and uniform fees based in whole or in part on the characteristics of the property benefited by the facilities, systems and management plans. In establishing the fees, the city shall consider and provide appropriate exemptions or credits for properties that have installed and are maintaining storm water facilities that meet best management practices and are approved or inspected by the city. The assessed fees shall be filed with the city treasurer. An ordinance shall specify whether payments are to be made by annual or more frequent installments.(D) FEES.--(1) FOR THE PURPOSES OF FUNDING THE CONSTRUCTION, 20250HB0990PN1328 - 8 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION OF STORM WATER MANAGEMENT FACILITIES, SYSTEMS AND MANAGEMENT PLANS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS CHAPTER, A CITY MAY ASSESS REASONABLE AND UNIFORM FEES BASED IN WHOLE OR IN PART ON THE CHARACTERISTICS OF THE PROPERTY BENEFITED BY THE FACILITIES, SYSTEMS AND MANAGEMENT PLANS.(2) IN ESTABLISHING THE FEES, THE CITY MAY INCLUDE A MEASURE OF A PROPERTY'S IMPERVIOUS SURFACE AS DETERMINED BY THE CITY. ALL PROPERTIES CONTAINING IMPERVIOUS SURFACE ARE PRESUMED TO BENEFIT FROM THE CITY'S STORM WATER PLANNING, MANAGEMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE TERM "IMPERVIOUS SURFACE" MEANS AN AREA, MATERIAL, STRUCTURE, SURFACE OR IMPROVEMENT THAT DOES NOT ALLOW OR THAT REDUCES OR PREVENTS INFILTRATION OR WATER INTO SOIL, INCLUDING COMPACTED DIRT, GRAVEL, CONCRETE, ASPHALT, ROADS, SIDEWALKS, PARKING LOTS, DRIVEWAYS, PATIOS, ROOFS, GARAGES AND STORAGE SHEDS.(3) IN ESTABLISHING THE FEES, THE CITY SHALL CONSIDER AND PROVIDE APPROPRIATE EXEMPTIONS OR CREDITS FOR PROPERTIES THAT HAVE INSTALLED AND ARE MAINTAINING STORM WATER FACILITIES THAT MEET BEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICES AND ARE APPROVED OR INSPECTED BY THE CITY. THE ASSESSED FEES SHALL BE FILED WITH THE CITY TREASURER. AN ORDINANCE SHALL SPECIFY WHETHER PAYMENTS ARE TO BE MADE BY ANNUAL OR MORE FREQUENT INSTALLMENTS.(e) Methods of assessment.--A fee levied by the city may be assessed in one of the following methods:(1) On all properties in the city . (2) On all properties benefited by a specific storm water project.20250HB0990PN1328 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) By establishing a storm water management district and assessing the fee on all property owners in the district.(f) Use.--A fee collected for the purposes of storm water management may only be used for the purposes authorized under this chapter.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0990PN1328 - 10 - 123456